Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB7.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Camera monitoring system" means a system with one (1) or more camera sensors or computers installed
and operated on a school bus that:
(a) Produce recorded images; and
(b) Record the activation status of the stop arm and the time, date, and location of the school bus when
the recorded images are captured;
(2) "Owner" has the same meaning as in KRS 186.010;
(3) "Recorded images" means two (2) or more photographic images or a segment of any video medium
recorded by a camera monitoring system which show on at least one (1) image or portion of video the
registration plate number of a motor vehicle being operated in violation of Section 7 of this Act;
(4) "School district" means a county school district as described in KRS 160.010 or an independent school
district as described in KRS 160.020; and
(5) "Stop arm camera violation" means a violation of Section 7 of this Act that is recorded by a camera
monitoring system and enforced in accordance with Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A school district may install and maintain a camera monitoring system on any school bus operated by the
school district for the enforcement of a civil penalty against the owner of a motor vehicle for a stop arm
camera violation.
(2) A school district may contract with a private vendor or manufacturer to install, operate, and maintain
camera monitoring systems on school buses operated by the school district.
(3) A stop arm camera violation may be enforced by a law enforcement agency, a certified peace officer, or a
school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, upon review of the recorded images produced by a
camera monitoring system.
(4) A school bus with a camera monitoring system installed and maintained in accordance with this section
shall display a warning sign notifying the public of the camera monitoring system.
(5) Recorded images and other records related to a specific stop arm camera violation are private information
and shall only be accessible to authorized personnel for the purpose of enforcing stop arm camera
violations.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The amount of a civil penalty for a stop arm camera violation shall be:
(a) Three hundred dollars ($300) for the first civil penalty; and
(b) Five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent civil penalty issued to an owner within a three (3)
year period.
(2) All revenue generated from a civil penalty for a stop arm camera violation shall be collected and retained by
the school district operating the camera monitoring system, unless the penalty is collected as a result of
action taken in the Court of Justice, in which case court costs may be deducted from the amount paid to the
school district.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) A law enforcement agency may charge and collect from the school district a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25)
from every civil penalty collected by the school district under this section for a violation that was enforced
by the law enforcement agency.
(4) A stop arm camera violation shall not result in points being assessed against the driving record of the owner
or operator of the vehicle in violation.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon a determination to issue a stop arm camera violation notice, the following documents shall be sent,
either by the law enforcement agency or the school district's agent, by first class mail to the owner of a
motor vehicle within thirty (30) days of a stop arm camera violation:
(a) The stop arm camera violation notice form as described in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) A copy of the recorded images for the stop arm camera violation; and
(c) A signed, sworn statement from a law enforcement officer that, based on inspection of the recorded
images, the motor vehicle was being operated in violation of Section 7 of this Act. This statement may
be signed electronically and is admissible in any proceeding challenging a stop arm camera violation.
(2) The stop arm camera violation notice form shall contain in substance the following information:
(a) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
(b) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a stop arm camera violation has been
committed by the owner of the vehicle and that the determination shall be final unless contested in
accordance with Section 5 of this Act;
(c) The date and time of the violation;
(d) The location of the violation;
(e) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which the civil penalty shall be paid;
(f) Instructions on how to pay the civil penalty to the school district or its designated agent;
(g) Information advising the owner as to the manner and time in which the civil penalty may be
contested; and
(h) A warning that failure to pay the civil penalty imposed or to contest the matter in a timely manner is
an admission of liability and shall result in the suspension of the motor vehicle's registration.
(3) A recorded image produced by a camera monitoring system shall be destroyed:
(a) No later than thirty-one (31) days from the date the recorded image is captured if the recorded image
does not result in a stop arm camera violation notice form issued under this section; or
(b) Upon final disposition of the stop arm camera violation if the recorded image results in a stop arm
camera violation notice form issued under this section.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A recorded image produced by a camera monitoring system shall be sufficient evidence of a violation of
Section 7 of this Act and shall be admitted without further authentication for the purposes of enforcement.
There shall be a rebuttable presumption that when any school bus is stopped with its stop arm activated it is
for the purpose of receiving or discharging passengers, and that the school bus signal lights are activated
and operational when a recorded image includes an electronic indicator signifying activation of signal
lights.
(2) In a contest to a stop arm camera violation, liability shall be determined by a preponderance of the evidence
and it shall be a defense that:
(a) The motor vehicle or the motor vehicle registration plates were stolen before the violation occurred
and were not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation;
(b) The civil penalty is not enforceable because at the time and location of the violation the stop arm was
not activated;

CHAPTER 62 3
(c) The owner was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation. An owner who raises this
defense shall identify, under penalty of perjury, the person who was operating the vehicle at the time
of the violation, including at a minimum the operator's name and address;
(d) The person operating the motor vehicle received a citation from a law enforcement officer for a
violation of Section 7 of this Act at the date and approximate time listed on the stop arm camera
violation form;
(e) The violation was necessary to allow the passage of an emergency vehicle; or
(f) The violation occurred while the operator was participating in a funeral procession.
(3) A contest to a stop arm camera violation shall be heard by the District Court, and the school district and
applicable law enforcement agency shall defend the stop arm camera violation.
(4) A school district may contract for legal services to fulfill the obligations in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) If a stop arm camera violation civil penalty is not paid or contested in accordance with Section 5 of this Act
within sixty (60) days, the applicable law enforcement agency or officer may notify the Transportation
Cabinet of the nonpayment.
(2) Upon notice of nonpayment, the cabinet shall:
(a) Send a notice of suspension by certified mail with restricted delivery and return receipt; and
(b) Suspend the registration of the motor vehicle until the civil penalty is paid.
(3) The applicable law enforcement agency or officer shall notify the cabinet of the need to release a
suspension levied under this section within one (1) business day of collecting the funds to satisfy the civil
penalty.
Section 7. KRS 189.370 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If any school or church bus used in the transportation of children is stopped upon a highway for the purpose of
receiving or discharging passengers, with the stop arm and signal lights activated, the operator of a vehicle
approaching from any direction shall bring the[his] vehicle to a stop and shall not proceed until the bus has
completed receiving or discharging passengers and has been put into motion. The stop requirement provided
for in this section shall not apply to vehicles approaching a stopped bus from the opposite direction upon a
highway of four (4) or more lanes divided by an elevated barrier or unpaved median.
(2) [Subsection (1) of ]This section shall be applicable only when the bus displays the markings and equipment
required by Kentucky minimum specifications for school buses.
(3) If any vehicle is witnessed to be in violation of[ subsection (1) of] this section and the identity of the operator
is not otherwise apparent, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person in whose name the vehicle is
registered or leased was the operator of the vehicle at the time of the alleged violation and is subject to the
penalties as provided for in KRS 189.990(5).
Section 8. KRS 189.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.020 to 189.040, subsection (1) or (4) of KRS
189.050, KRS 189.060 to 189.080, subsections (1) to (3) of KRS 189.090, KRS 189.100, 189.110, 189.130 to
189.160, subsections (2) to (4) of KRS 189.190, KRS 189.200, 189.285, subsection (1) or (2) of KRS 189.290,
189.300 to 189.360, KRS 189.380, KRS 189.400 to 189.430, KRS 189.450 to 189.458, KRS 189.4595 to
189.480, subsection (1) of KRS 189.520, KRS 189.540, KRS 189.570 to 189.590, except subsection (1)(b) or
(6)(b) of KRS 189.580, KRS 189.345, subsection (6) of KRS 189.456, and 189.960 shall be fined not less than
twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Any person who violates
subsection (1)(a) of KRS 189.580 shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than two thousand
dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both, unless the accident
involved death or serious physical injury and the person knew or should have known of the death or serious
physical injury, in which case the person shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who violates
paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of KRS 189.390 shall be fined not less than eleven dollars ($11) nor more than
thirty dollars ($30). Neither court costs nor fees shall be taxed against any person violating paragraph (c) of
subsection (5) of KRS 189.390.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, any person who violates the weight
provisions of KRS 189.212, 189.221, 189.222, 189.226, 189.230, 189.270, or 189.2713 shall be
fined two cents ($0.02) per pound for each pound of excess load when the excess is five
thousand (5,000) pounds or less. When the excess exceeds five thousand (5,000) pounds the fine
shall be two cents ($0.02) per pound for each pound of excess load, but the fine levied shall not
be less than one hundred dollars ($100) and shall not be more than five hundred dollars ($500).
2. Any person who violates a posted bridge weight limit on a state-maintained bridge that is more
than seventy-five (75) years old shall be fined:
a. Five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense;
b. One thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second offense within a one (1) year period; and
c. Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for any subsequent offense within a one (1) year period.
The Transportation Cabinet shall erect signs warning drivers of the increased fines in this
subparagraph. Signs erected under this subparagraph shall be placed in such a manner that
drivers are given adequate warning in order to exit the road prior to crossing the bridge. If
warning signs are not erected in accordance with this subparagraph, the fines in this
subparagraph shall not apply and violators shall be fined under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph.
(b) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.271 and is operating on a route designated on the
permit shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100); otherwise, the penalties in paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall apply.
(c) Any person who violates any provision of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS 189.050, subsection (4) of KRS
189.090, KRS 189.221 to 189.230, 189.270, 189.2713, 189.280, or the dimension provisions of KRS
189.212, for which another penalty is not specifically provided shall be fined not less than ten dollars
($10) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).
(d) 1. Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 177.985 while operating on a route designated in
KRS 177.986 shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).
2. Any person who operates a vehicle with a permit under KRS 177.985 in excess of eighty
thousand (80,000) pounds while operating on a route not designated in KRS 177.986 shall be
fined one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(e) Nothing in this subsection or in KRS 189.221 to 189.228 shall be deemed to prejudice or affect the
authority of the Department of Vehicle Regulation to suspend or revoke certificates of common carriers,
permits of contract carriers, or drivers' or chauffeurs' licenses, for any violation of KRS 189.221 to
189.228 or any other act applicable to motor vehicles, as provided by law.
(3) (a) Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS 189.190 shall be fined not more than fifteen dollars
($15).
(b) Any person who violates subsection (5) of KRS 189.190 shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars
($35) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).
(4) (a) Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS 189.210 shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars
($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(b) Any peace officer who fails, when properly informed, to enforce KRS 189.210 shall be fined not less
than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(c) All fines collected under this subsection, after payment of commissions to officers entitled thereto, shall
go to the county road fund if the offense is committed in the county, or to the city street fund if
committed in the city.
(5) Any person who violates KRS 189.370 shall for the first offense be fined not less than two[one] hundred
dollars ($200)[($100)] nor more than five[two] hundred dollars ($500)[($200)] or imprisoned not less than
thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days, or both. For each subsequent offense occurring within three (3)
years, the person shall be fined not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than one thousand[five
hundred] dollars ($1,000)[($500)] or imprisoned not less than sixty (60) days nor more than six (6) months, or
both. The minimum fine for this violation shall not be subject to suspension. A minimum of six (6) points shall
be assessed against the driving record of any person convicted.

CHAPTER 62 5
(6) Any person who violates KRS 189.500 shall be fined not more than fifteen dollars ($15) in excess of the cost
of the repair of the road.
(7) Any person who violates KRS 189.510 or KRS 189.515 shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor
more than fifty dollars ($50).
(8) Any peace officer who violates subsection (2) of KRS 189.520 shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars
($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(9) (a) Any person who violates KRS 189.530(1) shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more
than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned not less than thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12)
months, or both.
(b) Any person who violates KRS 189.530(2) shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more
than one hundred dollars ($100).
(10) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.550 shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
(11) Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS 189.560 shall be fined not less than thirty dollars ($30) nor
more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
(12) The fines imposed by paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and subsections (6) and (7) of this section shall, in the
case of a public highway, be paid into the county road fund, and, in the case of a privately owned road or
bridge, be paid to the owner. These fines shall not bar an action for damages for breach of contract.
(13) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.120 shall be fined not less than twenty dollars
($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
(14) Any person who violates any provision of KRS 189.575 shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor
more than twenty-five dollars ($25).
(15) Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS 189.231 shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor
more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
(16) Any person who violates restrictions or regulations established by the secretary of transportation pursuant to
subsection (3) of KRS 189.231 shall, upon first offense, be fined one hundred dollars ($100) and, upon
subsequent convictions, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500) or imprisoned for thirty (30) days, or both.
(17) (a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 189.565 shall be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor.
(b) In addition to the penalties prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, in case of violation by any
person in whose name the vehicle used in the transportation of inflammable liquids or explosives is
licensed, the person shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500). Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.
(18) Any person who abandons a vehicle upon the right-of-way of a state highway for three (3) consecutive days
shall be fined not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned
for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days.
(19) Every person violating KRS 189.393 shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor, unless the offense is being
committed by a defendant fleeing the commission of a felony offense which the defendant was also charged
with violating and was subsequently convicted of that felony, in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor.
(20) Any law enforcement agency which fails or refuses to forward the reports required by KRS 189.635 shall be
subject to the penalties prescribed in KRS 17.157.
(21) A person who operates a bicycle in violation of the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS
189.287 shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(22) Any person who violates KRS 189.860 shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned
for not more than six (6) months, or both.
(23) Any person who violates KRS 189.754 shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than
three hundred dollars ($300).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(24) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(3)(a) shall be fined fifty dollars ($50). This fine shall
be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to
KRS 24A.175, additional court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, the fee imposed pursuant to KRS 24A.1765,
or any other additional fees or costs.
(25) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(3)(b) shall [not be issued a uniform citation, but shall
instead receive a courtesy warning up until July 1, 2009. For a violation on or after July 1, 2009, the person
shall ]be fined thirty dollars ($30). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this
subsection shall not be subject to court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.175, additional court costs pursuant to KRS
24A.176, a fee imposed pursuant to KRS 24A.1765, or any other additional fees or costs. A person who has
not been previously charged with a violation of KRS 189.125(3)(b) may elect to acquire a booster seat meeting
the requirements of KRS 189.125. Upon presentation of sufficient proof of the acquisition, the charge shall be
dismissed and no fees or costs shall be imposed.
(26) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 189.125(6) shall be fined an amount not to exceed twenty-five
dollars ($25). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be
subject to court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.175, additional court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, the fee
imposed pursuant to KRS 24A.1765, or any other additional fees or costs.
(27) Fines levied pursuant to this chapter shall be assessed in the manner required by KRS 534.020, in amounts
consistent with this chapter. Nonpayment of fines shall be governed by KRS 534.020 and 534.060.
(28) A licensed driver under the age of eighteen (18) charged with a moving violation pursuant to this chapter as
the driver of a motor vehicle may be referred, prior to trial, by the court to a diversionary program. The
diversionary program under this subsection shall consist of one (1) or both of the following:
(a) Execution of a diversion agreement which prohibits the driver from operating a vehicle for a period not
to exceed forty-five (45) days and which allows the court to retain the driver's operator's license during
this period; and
(b) Attendance at a driver improvement clinic established pursuant to KRS 186.574. If the person
completes the terms of this diversionary program satisfactorily the violation shall be dismissed.
(29) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS 189.459 shall be fined two hundred fifty
dollars ($250). The fines and costs for a violation of subsection (2) or (3) of KRS 189.459 shall be collected
and disposed of in accordance with KRS 24A.180. Once deposited into the State Treasury, ninety percent
(90%) of the fine collected under this subsection shall immediately be forwarded to the personal care
assistance program under KRS 205.900 to 205.920. Ten percent (10%) of the fine collected under this
subsection shall annually be returned to the county where the violation occurred and distributed equally to all
law enforcement agencies within the county.
(30) Any person who violates KRS 189.292 or 189.294 shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25) for the first offense
and fifty dollars ($50) for each subsequent offense.
(31) Any person who violates KRS 189.281(5) or (7)(b) shall be subject to a fine of two hundred fifty dollars
($250). This fine shall be subject to prepayment. A fine imposed under this subsection shall not be subject to
court costs pursuant to KRS 24A.175, additional costs pursuant to KRS 24A.176, the fee imposed pursuant to
KRS 24A.1765, or any other additional fees or costs.
(32) Any person who violates subsection (3) or (4) of KRS 189.290 and causes physical injury to a person shall be
fined five hundred dollars ($500).
Signed by Governor April 9, 2026.